Utah statutes.
32A-3-102.   Application requirements.
(1)  A person seeking to operate a package agency as a package agent under
this chapter shall file a written application with the department in a form
prescribed by the department.
(2)  The application shall be accompanied by:
(a)  a nonrefundable application fee of $100;
(b)  written consent of the local authority;
(c)  evidence of proximity to any community location, with proximity
requirements being governed by Section 32A-3-101;
(d)  a bond as specified by Section 32A-3-105;
(e)  a floor plan of the premises, including a description and highlighting of
that part of the premises in which the applicant proposes that the package
agency be established;
(f)  evidence that the package agency is carrying public liability insurance
in an amount and form satisfactory to the department;
(g)  a signed consent form stating that the package agent will permit any
authorized representative of the commission, department, or any law
enforcement officer to have unrestricted right to enter the package agency;
(h)  in the case of an applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or
limited liability company, proper verification evidencing that the person or
persons signing the package agency application are authorized to so act on
behalf of the partnership, corporation, or limited liability company; and
(i)  any other information as the commission or department may direct.
